Massachusetts, session 194th, H3147.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “amended”, in line 769, the
following words:- , or a private nonprofit trust established pursuant to chapter 203 organized for
the purposes of land conservation, which is authorized to do business in the commonwealth, and
which has tax-exempt status as a nonprofit charitable organization as described in section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended..
SECTION 2. Said section 6 of said chapter 62, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 835, the figure “$2,000,000” and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- $3,000,000.
of 3

SECTION 3. Said section 6 of said chapter 62 is hereby further amended by striking out
the figure “$3,000,000”, inserted by section 40B, and inserting in place thereof the following
figure:- $4,000,000.
SECTION 4. Said section 6 of said chapter 62 is hereby further amended by striking out,
in line 835, the figure “$4,000,000”, inserted by section 40C, and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- $5,000,000.
SECTION 5. Said section 6 of said chapter 62 is hereby further amended by striking out
the figure “$5,000,000”, inserted by section 40D, and inserting in place thereof the following
figure:- $2,000,000.
SECTION 6. Section 38AA of chapter 63, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “amended”, in line 29, the following words:- , or a private nonprofit trust
established pursuant to chapter 203 organized for the purposes of land conservation, which is
authorized to do business in the commonwealth, and which has tax-exempt status as a nonprofit
charitable organization as described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended.
SECTION 7. Said section 38AA of said chapter 63, as so appearing, is hereby amended
by striking out, in line 88, the figure “$2,000,000” and inserting in place thereof the following
figure:- $3,000,000.
SECTION 8. Said section 38AA of said chapter 63, as so appearing, is hereby amended
by striking out, in line 88, the figure “$3,000,000” and inserting in place thereof the following
figure:- $4,000,000.
of 3

SECTION 9. Said section 38AA of said chapter 63, as so appearing, is hereby amended
by striking out, in line 88, the figure “$4,000,000.” and inserting in place thereof the following
figure:- “$5,000,000”
SECTION 10. Said section 38AA of said chapter 63 is hereby further amended by
striking out the figure “$5,000,000”, inserted by section 41D, and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- $2,000,000.
SECTION 11. Sections 1, 2, 6 and 7 shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 12. Sections 3 and 8 shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 13. Sections 4 and 9 shall take effect on January 1, 2028.
SECTION 14. Sections 5 and 10 of this act shall take effect on December 31, 2035.
of 3